Utah statutes.
38-1a-209.   Abuse of registry -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section, "third party" means an owner, an original contractor, a subcontractor, or any interested party.

(2)  A person abuses the registry if that person files a notice in the registry:

(a)  without a good faith basis for doing so;

(b)  with the intent to exact more than is due from the owner or any other interested party; or

(c)  to procure an unjustified advantage or benefit.

(3)  A person who abuses the registry as described in Subsection (2) is liable to a third party who is affected by the notice for twice the amount of the actual damages incurred by the third party or $2,000, whichever is greater.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

